North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 1. Certificate of Authority.

§ 55-15-01.
Authority to transact business required.

A foreign corporation may not transact business in this State until it obtains a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State.

Without excluding other activities which may not constitute transacting business in this State, a foreign corporation shall not be considered to be transacting business in this State solely for the purposes of this Chapter, by reason of carrying on in this State any one or more of the following activities:

Maintaining or defending any action or suit or any administrative or arbitration proceeding, or effecting the settlement thereof or the settlement of claims or disputes;

Holding meetings of its directors or shareholders or carrying on other activities concerning its internal affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts or borrowing money in this State, with or without security, even if such borrowings are repeated and continuous transactions;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of its securities, or appointing and maintaining trustees or depositories with relation to its securities;

Soliciting or procuring orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, where such orders require acceptance without this State before becoming binding contracts;

Making or investing in loans with or without security including servicing of mortgages or deeds of trust through independent agencies within the State, the conducting of foreclosure proceedings and sale, the acquiring of property at foreclosure sale and the management and rental of such property for a reasonable time while liquidating its investment, provided no office or agency therefor is maintained in this State;

Taking security for or collecting debts due to it or enforcing any rights in property securing the same;

Transacting business in interstate commerce;

Conducting an isolated transaction completed within a period of six months and not in the course of a number of repeated transactions of like nature;

Selling through independent contractors;

Owning, without more, real or personal property.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Foreign insurance companies that are licensed by the Commissioner of Insurance are not required to obtain a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State.

The following foreign corporations are not required to obtain a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State:

A nonresident business solely performing disaster-related work in this State during a disaster response period at the request of a critical infrastructure company. The definitions and provisions of

G.S. 166A-19.70

A apply to this subdivision.

A person issued a temporary license by the Department of Revenue under

G.S. 105-449.69

A to import, export, distribute, or transport motor fuel in this State in response to a disaster declaration.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 93; Rev., s. 1193; 1915, c. 196, s. 1; C.S., s. 1180; G.S., s. 55-117; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.20; 1993, c. 552, s. 16; 2019-187, s. 1(b).

§ 55-15-02.
Consequences of transacting business without authority.

No foreign corporation transacting business in this State without permission obtained through a certificate of authority under this Chapter or through domestication under prior acts shall be permitted to maintain any action or proceeding in any court of this State unless the foreign corporation has obtained a certificate of authority prior to trial.An issue arising under this subsection must be raised by motion and determined by the trial judge prior to trial.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

A foreign corporation failing to obtain a certificate of authority as required by this Chapter or by prior acts then applicable shall be liable to the State for the years or parts thereof during which it transacted business in this State without a certificate of authority in an amount equal to all fees and taxes which would have been imposed by law upon such corporation had it duly applied for and received such permission, plus interest and all penalties imposed by law for failure to pay such fees and taxes. In addition, the foreign corporation shall be liable for a civil penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) for each day, but not to exceed a total of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each year or part thereof, it transacts business in this State without a certificate of authority. The Attorney General may bring actions to recover all amounts due the State under the provisions of this subsection.The clear proceeds of civil penalties provided for in this subsection shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the failure of a foreign corporation to obtain a certificate of authority does not impair the validity of its corporate acts or prevent it from defending any proceeding in this State.

The Secretary of State is hereby directed to require that every foreign corporation transacting business in this State comply with the provisions of this Chapter. The Secretary of State is authorized to employ such assistants as shall be deemed necessary in his office for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this Article and for making such investigations as shall be necessary to ascertain foreign corporations now transacting business in this State which may have failed to comply with the provisions of this Chapter.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 57; 1903, c. 766; Rev., s. 1194; 1915, c. 263; C.S., s. 1181; 1935, c. 44; 1937, c. 343; 1939, c. 57; G.S., ss. 55-118, 55-120; 1953, c. 1152; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1998-215, s. 117; 1999-151, s. 1.

§ 55-15-03.
Application for certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation may apply for a certificate of authority to transact business in this State by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. The application must set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation or, if its name is unavailable for use in this State, a corporate name that satisfies the requirements of Article 3 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes;

The name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

Its date of incorporation and period of duration;

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of its principal office if any, and the county in which the principal office, if any, is located;

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of its registered office in this State, the county in which the registered office is located, and the name of its registered agent at that office; and

The names and usual business addresses of its current officers.

The foreign corporation shall deliver with the completed application a certificate of existence (or a document of similar import) duly authenticated by the secretary of state or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law it is incorporated.

If the Secretary of State finds that the application conforms to law he shall, when all fees have been tendered as prescribed in this Chapter:

Endorse on the application and an exact or conformed copy thereof the word “filed” and the hour, day, month, and year of the filing thereof;

File in his office the application and the certificate of existence (or document of similar import as described in subsection (b) of this section);

Issue a certificate of authority to transact business in this State to which he shall affix the exact or conformed copy of the application; and

Send to the foreign corporation or its representative the certificate of authority, together with the exact or conformed copy of the application affixed thereto.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 57; 1903, c. 766; Rev., s. 1194; 1915, c. 263; C.S., s. 1181; 1935, c. 44; 1939, c. 57; G.S., s. 55-118; 1953, c. 1152; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1957, c. 979, s. 8; 1969, c. 751, s. 41; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, ss. 12.1(b), 12.21; 2001-358, s. 17; 2001-387, ss. 27A, 169(a), 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§ 55-15-04.
Amended certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State must obtain an amended certificate of authority from the Secretary of State if it changes:

Its corporate name;

The period of its duration; or

The state or country of its incorporation.

A foreign corporation may apply for an amended certificate of authority by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing that sets forth:

The name of the foreign corporation and the name in which the corporation is authorized to transact business in North Carolina if different;

The name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

The date it was originally authorized to transact business in this State;

A statement of the change or changes being made.Except for the content of the application, the requirements of

G.S. 55-15-03

for obtaining an original certificate of authority apply to obtaining an amended certificate under this section.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.22.

§ 55-15-05.
Effect of certificate of authority.

A certificate of authority authorizes the foreign corporation to which it is issued to transact business in this State subject, however, to the right of the State to revoke the certificate as provided in this Chapter. A foreign corporation may qualify in this State as executor, administrator, or guardian, or as trustee under the will of any person domiciled in this State at the time of that person’s death only in accordance with applicable provisions of Article 24 of Chapter 53.A foreign corporation qualifying as testamentary trustee or executor under the provisions of this section shall appoint a process agent and file such appointment with the court as required by G.S. 28A-4-2(4).

Except as otherwise provided by this Chapter, a foreign corporation with a valid certificate of authority has the same but no greater rights and has the same but no greater privileges as, and is subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities now or later imposed on, a domestic corporation of like character.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 93; Rev., s. 1193; 1915, c. 196, s. 1; C.S., s. 1180; G.S., s. 55-117; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 839; 1985, c. 689, s. 25; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2001-263, s. 4.

§ 55-15-06.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 18, effective January 1, 2002.

§ 55-15-07.
Registered office and registered agent of foreign corporation.

Each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State must maintain a registered office and registered agent as required by Article 4 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes and is subject to service on the Secretary of State under that Article.

History.

1901, c. 5; Rev., s. 1243; C.S., s. 1137; G.S., s. 55-38; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2000-140, s. 101(c); 2001-358, s. 47(b); 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§§ 55-15-08 through 55-15-10.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 47(c), effective January 1, 2002.

§§ 55-15-11 through 55-15-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.